Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1772.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-112, to read: START_STATUTE41-112. State agencies; tribal liaison The governor shall require all state agencies to employ a tribal liaison from a federally recognized Indian tribe located in this state to represent and facilitate communications between each state agency and tribal communities in this state. END_STATUTE